ja: ピンボールマシンフォーマット: キャビネットキットフラットパック; デジタルキャビネット; メカニカルフルサイズ; ミニ; 卓上; バーチャルキャビネット; その他
ko: 핀볼 머신 형식: 캐비닛 키트 플랫팩; 디지털 캐비닛; 기계식 풀사이즈; 미니; 테이블탑; 가상 캐비닛; 기타
cs: Formát pinballového automatu: Stavebnice skříně; Digitální skříň; Mechanická plná velikost; Mini; Deska stolu; Virtuální skříň; Jiné
lt-LT: Fliperio mašinos formatas: Spintelės rinkinys plokščioje pakuotėje; Skaitmeninė spintelė; Mechaninis pilno dydžio; Mini; Stalinis; Virtuali spintelė; Kita
es: Formato de máquina de pinball: Kit de gabinete empaquetado plano; Gabinete digital; Mecánico de tamaño completo; Mini; Sobremesa; Gabinete virtual; Otros
sl-SI: Format fliperja: Komplet omare ploska embalaža; Digitalna omara; Mehanski polne velikosti; Mini; Namizni; Virtualna omara; Drugo
hr-HR: Format flipera: Komplet kućišta u ravnom pakiranju; Digitalno kućište; Mehanički pune veličine; Mini; Stolni; Virtualno kućište; Ostalo
nl: Flipperkast formaat: Kastkit plat pakket; Digitale kast; Mechanisch volledige grootte; Mini; Tafelblad; Virtuele kast; Andere
de: Flipperautomaten-Format: Schrank-Bausatz Flachpack; Digitales Gehäuse; Mechanisch in voller Größe; Mini; Tischgerät; Virtuelles Gehäuse; Sonstiges
vi: Định dạng máy pinball: Bộ tủ lắp ráp phẳng; Tủ kỹ thuật số; Cơ khí kích thước đầy đủ; Siêu ngắn; Trên mặt bàn; Tủ ảo; Khác
sv: Flipperspelsformat: Skåpkit platt paket; Digitalt skåp; Mekanisk fullstorlek; Mini; Bordsskiva; Virtuellt skåp; Övrigt
ru: Формат пинбольного автомата: Комплект корпуса в плоской упаковке; Цифровой корпус; Механический полноразмерный; Мини; Настольный; Виртуальный корпус; Другой
pl: Format automatu do pinballa: Zestaw szafki do złożenia; Szafka cyfrowa; Mechaniczna pełnowymiarowa; Min.; Blat stołu; Szafka wirtualna; Inne
sk-SK: Formát pinballového automatu: Súprava skrinky na zloženie; Digitálna skrinka; Mechanická plnorozmerná; Mini; Stolový; Virtuálna skrinka; Iné
pt-PT: Formato da máquina de pinball: Kit de armário plano; Armário digital; Mecânico tamanho completo; Mini; Tampo de mesa; Armário virtual; Outro
hu: Flippergép formátuma: Szekrény készlet lapos csomag; Digitális szekrény; Mechanikus teljes méret; Mini; Asztali; Virtuális szekrény; Egyéb
bg-BG: Форма на машината за флипер: Комплект кабинет в разглобен вид; Цифров кабинет; Механичен в пълен размер; Мини; Плот за маса; Виртуален кабинет; Други
fr: Format du flipper: Kit cabinet à plat; Cabinet numérique; Mécanique pleine taille; Mini; De table; Cabinet virtuel; Autre
zh-CN: 弹球机形式: 机柜套件平板包装; 数字机柜; 机械全尺寸; 迷你; 桌面; 虚拟机柜; 其他
ro-RO: Formatul aparatului de pinball: Kit cabinet plat; Cabinet digital; Mecanic mărime completă; Mini; Blat; Cabinet virtual; Altele
en: Pinball machine format: Cabinet kit flat pack; Digital cabinet; Mechanical full-size; Mini; Tabletop; Virtual cabinet; Other
it: Formato della macchina flipper: Kit mobile flat pack; Mobile digitale; Meccanico a grandezza naturale; Mini; Da tavolo; Mobile virtuale; Altro
el: Μορφή μηχανής φλίπερ: Κιτ ερμαρίου επίπεδης συσκευασίας; Ψηφιακό ερμάριο; Μηχανικό πλήρους μεγέθους; Μίνι; Επιτραπέζια; Εικονικό ερμάριο; Άλλο
fi: Flipperikoneen muoto: Kaappipaketti litteäpakkaus; Digitaalinen kaappi; Mekaaninen täysikoko; Mini; Pöydällä pidettävä; Virtuaalikaappi; Muu
pt-BR: Formato da máquina de pinball: Kit de gabinete desmontado; Gabinete digital; Mecânica tamanho completo; Mini; Tampo de mesa; Gabinete virtual; Outro
nb: Flipperspillformat: Kabinettsett flatpakket; Digitalt kabinett; Mekanisk fullstørrelse; Mini; Bordplate; Virtuelt kabinett; Annet
tr: Langırt makinesi formatı: Kabin kiti düz paket; Dijital kabin; Mekanik tam boy; Mini; Masaüstü; Sanal kabin; Diğer
da: Flippermaskineformat: Kabinet-kit flad pakke; Digitalt kabinet; Mekanisk fuld størrelse; Mini; Bordplade; Virtuelt kabinet; Andet
th: รูปแบบเครื่องพินบอล: ชุดตู้แบบแพ็คแบน; ตู้ดิจิทัล; แบบกลไกขนาดเต็ม; มินิ; วางของได้; ตู้เสมือน; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 彈珠台形式: 機台套件平裝; 數位機台; 機械全尺寸; 迷你裙; 桌上型; 虛擬機台; 其他